Washington statutes.
RCW 18.227.005

Finding.

The legislature finds that a behavioral health support specialist is a new member of the workforce in Washington state trained in the competencies developed by the University of Washington behavioral health support specialist clinical training program. The behavioral health support specialist clinical training program is characterized by brief, evidence-based interventions delivered to the intensity and expected duration of the behavioral health problem. The approach features routine outcome monitoring and regular, outcome-focused supervision. Use of behavioral health support specialists in Washington is expected to improve access to behavioral health services and ease workforce shortages while helping behavioral health professionals work at the top of their scope of practice.

[ 2023 c 270 s 1.]